Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Organization Generally

Cross references. —

As to joint operation and cooperation between districts, see §§

41-6-101

through

41-6-105

,

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to board of district managers with reference to irrigation and drainage districts, see §§

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to bonds held by state, see §§

41-6-201

through

41-6-209

.

As to determination of rights of joint users or claimants, see §§

41-6-301

through

41-6-308

.

As to contesting organization or assessments, and as to limitation of actions, see §§

41-6-401

,

41-6-402

.

As to taxes and assessments, and as to enforcement of liens, see §§

41-6-501

through

41-6-507

.

As to dissolution of irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-1001

through

41-7-1006

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-7-201.
Filing of landowners' petition; contents; amendments; multiple petitions.

Whenever a majority of the freeholders owning lands and the entrymen upon public lands in any district who shall represent one-third the area of lands within said district, or whenever the freeholders owning lands and the entrymen upon public lands who shall represent more than one-half the area of lands within said district, desire to provide for the irrigation of the same; or to improve the existing water supply for said lands; or to purchase, extend, operate or maintain constructed irrigation works; or to cooperate with the United States under the federal reclamation laws heretofore or hereafter enacted, or for the assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States on account of district lands, they may file in the district court of the county which embraces the largest acreage of the district, a petition, hereinafter referred to as the “petition”, which shall include:

The name of the proposed irrigation district;

The necessity of the proposed work describing the necessity;

The object and purpose of the system proposed to be constructed, together with a general description thereof;

A general description of the lands proposed to be included in said district. Accompanying said petition shall be a preliminary engineering report on the feasibility of the project, including a report on the sufficiency of its water supply; the approximate area of irrigable land within the district, including an estimate of the cost of construction; all of which shall be approved by the state engineer;

The names of all freeholders owning lands and the entrymen on public lands in said district, when known;

Whether or not the petitioners desire and propose to cooperate with the United States;

A general prayer for the organization of the district.

No petition having as many signers as are required by this section shall be declared void, but the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended in form and substance to conform to the facts, if the facts justify the organization of an irrigation district. Several similar petitions for the organization of the same district may be circulated, and when filed, shall together be regarded as one petition having as many signers as there are separate signers on the several petitions filed. All petitions for the organization of said district filed prior to the hearing on said petition shall be considered by the court, the same as if filed with the first petition placed on file, and the signatures thereon contained shall be counted in determining whether sufficient persons have signed said petition.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, § 951; R.S. 1931, § 122-701; C.S. 1945, § 71-801; W.S. 1957, § 41-273.

Cross references. —

As to requirement that electric utilities use a net metering program, see §

37-16-101

et seq.

Constitutionality. —

Method provided for creation of district on petition is not in violation of the constitution. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Irrigation district law is constitutional. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Sections

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

are not in violation of the constitutional provision requiring property to be uniformly assessed and just valuation for taxation. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Sections

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

are not in violation of constitutional provision prohibiting imposition of tax without consent of people, and requiring uniformity. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Sections

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

do not violate constitutional provision prohibiting passage of debts in excess of taxes for the current year, unless submitted to voters. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Sections

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

do not violate constitutional provisions prohibiting passage of local or special laws for assessment or collection of taxes, as exactions made by districts are not taxes, nor is this article a special law. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Sections

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

are not in violation of constitutional provision requiring every law imposing tax to state distinctly its object to which only it shall be applied. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Sections

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

are not unconstitutional as taking property without just compensation. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Constitutional provision prohibiting organization of municipal corporations without consent of electors is inapplicable to irrigation districts. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Original irrigation district legislation and its subsequent history. —

See Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Originally, even the cost
of maintenance was within the provisions of this section so as to
require the filing of the report under §

41-7-305

.

— In 1923
the legislature revised § 973, C.S. 1920 (now
§

41-7-401

), and added the section which is now
§

41-7-402

, providing for the filing with the court of an “itemized
estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the district
for the purpose of constructing new work, maintenance and to meet
the yearly current expenses of the district.” Such additional provision
in effect eliminated the “expenses of any current year” from the requirements
of this section and
§

41-7-305

.Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Court's jurisdiction. —

Court did not lose jurisdiction, by failure to give notice immediately, by amendment of petition changing name of district, because engineer's report became inadequate, nor because another irrigation district within its boundaries was organized in meantime, as jurisdiction once acquired is not defeated by subsequent events. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Fact that notice did not contain any information as to change of name, did not destroy the court's jurisdiction, which it obtained by the filing of the petition with a sufficient number of signers. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Statute, by providing that court shall order notice given after filing of the petition, necessarily presupposes that the court acquires jurisdiction of the subject matter in the particular case before notice is given. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Failure to give notice immediately after filing of the petition is not jurisdictional, as the court obtains jurisdiction by filing of petition, and the notice neither confers nor destroys jurisdiction. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Succeeding sections to govern petitions filed under this section. —

This section permits the majority of the owners of the land in the district to file a petition whenever they desire to, (a) provide for the irrigation of the lands; (b) to improve the existing water supply for the lands; (c) to purchase, extend, operate, or maintain constructed irrigation works; or (d) to cooperate with the United States in certain respects under federal reclamation laws. Under a reasonable interpretation the legislature meant the succeeding sections to govern any of these circumstances. It would be unreasonable to choose one of the above-mentioned functions to the exclusion of the others. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Provisions must be construed in pari materia. —

This section states that the engineering report should show the feasibility of the project. It is not specifically stated that the report must show the economic feasibility and probably in the main refers to physical feasibility. In any event, that provision does not stand alone. Other provisions must be construed in pari materia. The section also provides that an irrigation district may be organized for the purpose of the assumption as principal or guarantor of an indebtedness to the United States. Section

41-7-303

provides that the commissioners of the district may negotiate a contract “for the assumption, as principal or guarantor of the indebtedness to the United States on account of district lands,” and the section further provides that the contract must be approved by the water users. Effect must be given to these provisions. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Effect must be given to every part of the statute. —

Insofar as possible, effect must be given to every part of the statute (§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

). This means that if a procedure is applicable to a state objective there must be compliance. Accordingly, the district or its officers should fulfill every requirement of the statutes which reasonably can apply to that which is expected to be accomplished under this section. It would be absurd to say that the report required by §

41-7-305

must be furnished at the time of the organization of a district but is not required at any later time even though the district then seeks “to improve the existing water supply for said lands; or to purchase,[and] extend” constructed irrigation works in an amount which equals or exceeds the cost of the original works. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

The words “new work” used
in the statute (§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

) are to be read in connection
with the words “expenses of any current year”

and when
so construed mean work which may in one sense be considered new, as
distinguished from strict maintenance, but is nevertheless work which
would tend to continue the district in as good condition as in the
past rather than an extension of the irrigation works or improvement
of the existing water supply. Any question on such classification
of proposed work is subject to determination by the district court
to which the budget is submitted.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

To state it another way,
§

41-7-402

, providing for the submission of an itemized estimate
of yearly current expenses and hearing thereon after notice, sufficiently
protects the freeholders as interested parties and informs the court
so that an intelligent determination may be made as to the assessments
for such purposes. Any other assessments can be effective only after
due hearings based on preliminary engineering report (§

41-7-201

) and commissioners' report (§

41-7-305

). This will inform landowners as to the proposed expenditures,
the measure of the prospective benefits, and their assumption of the
increased expenses and will simultaneously enable the court to make
intelligent decisions thereon.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

“No petition having as many signers as are required by this section shall be declared void” construed. —

This section provides: “No petition having as many signers as are required by this section shall be declared void …” The meaning of this is not clear, but the statute apparently contemplates that the petition together with its exhibits shall be prima facie sufficient to give the court jurisdiction in the premises. It might prove to be dangerous to permit an irrigation district to be organized with the mentioned provision of the statute if that stood alone. Signatures might be forged and it might prove to be difficult for contestants to prove the forgery of these signatures. But that provision does not stand alone. Section

41-7-204

provides for notice to be given residents, mortgagees and judgment lien holders. It also provides that the notice shall be published in a newspaper for three weeks. Section

41-7-205

provides for notification of nonresidents. These statutory provisions and the compliance therewith would seem to enable all parties interested to fully protect themselves. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Feasibility of district. —

Statute contemplates that the feasibility shall fairly and reasonably appear at time of the organization of the district, before too much additional expense and labor is incurred. In re Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 518, 76 P.2d 617,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1938).

Engineer not required to be licensed. —

The preliminary engineering reports required by this section do not have to be signed by an engineer licensed under the laws of the state. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Section does not require verification of the signature of the state engineer. —

Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Assessment of benefits. —

Assessment of benefits by irrigation district in proportion of each irrigable acre to total cost of project is not unjust or inequitable. In re Goshen Irrigation Dist., 42 Wyo. 229, 293 P. 373,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1930).

Amendments. —

Permitting files to be withdrawn and name of the district to be changed did not injure any of the parties, as court is authorized to permit amendments to the petition in form and substance. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Refusal of trial court to subtract signatures from petition sustained. —

A number of signers previously signed a petition to join the Midvale irrigation district as provided by §

41-7-305

, subsection (b). These parties, however, and their acreage in the North Pavillion area had not been taken into the Midvale irrigation district at the time of the organization of this district, and the trial court refused to subtract these signers from the number of signers of the petition. We think that the action of the trial court was correct. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Item held properly struck. —

Where an item requested by the commissioners in their petition for adjudication of June 2, 1958, was one falling within the provisions of §

41-7-201

, the officers of the district having ignored the clear prerequisites of the irrigation district statutes, the trial court had no alternative but to strike the item. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Rehearing. —

In proceeding for organization of irrigation district, fact that district at time of petition for rehearing in supreme court was not adverse to permitting exclusion of objectant's lands was not ground for rehearing, since they could be excluded by proceedings in trial court, and all controversy ended. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Nunc pro tunc order. —

On petition for organization of an irrigation district where court entered judgment, and at later date entered second judgment correcting an error in the first, the second judgment merely corrected mistake, was nothing more than a nunc pro tunc order correcting an omission, and did not destroy the validity of the notice of an appeal filed prior thereto. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Irrigation district not exempt from automobile license fees. —

An irrigation district not being a municipal corporation, but a corporation established for purposes chiefly private with powers conferred mainly for benefit of its own landowners, does not come within purview of statute to enable it to claim exemption from paying license fee on motor vehicles owned by the district. State ex rel. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Hunt, 49 Wyo. 497, 57 P.2d 793,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1936).

Cited

in

Eastern Laramie County Solid Waste v. State Bd. of Equalization, 9 P.3d 268,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 41-7-202.
Petitioner's affidavit.

The affidavit of any three (3) or more of the signers of said petition stating that they have examined it and are acquainted with the locality of said district and that said petition is signed by a sufficient number of corporations and adult persons owning lands in said district, to satisfy W.S.

41-7-201

, may be taken by the court or judge as sufficient evidence of the facts therein stated.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 13; C.S. 1920, § 957; R.S. 1931, § 122-707; C.S. 1945, § 71-807; W.S. 1957, § 41-274.

Quoted

in

Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1958).

§ 41-7-203.
Land that may be included in proposed district.

The lands proposed to be included in any irrigation district, need not be contiguous provided that the benefit of the proposed work in each part will exceed the damages from costs of said proposed work in each part; and provided further that the court shall be satisfied that said proposed work can be more cheaply done if in a single district than otherwise; and provided further that lands within a town or city may be included within the limits of any irrigation district, if the creation of such irrigation district will benefit such town or city in any amount equal to or in excess of the amount of assessment for construction against the lands therein.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 952; Laws 1931, ch. 79, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-702; C.S. 1945, § 71-802; W.S. 1957, § 41-275.

Section refers only to proposed work. —

Where work has been completed or substantially completed it is doubtful that this section has any particular bearing in a case. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

It states that “provided that the benefit of the proposed work in each part will exceed the damages from costs of said proposed work in each part.” The word “damages” is hardly apropos. The provision means merely that each part must be benefited by the proposed work and that the benefit must exceed the cost. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Facts sufficient to uphold trial court's decision “that said proposed work can be more cheaply done if in a single district than otherwise.” —

See Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

§ 41-7-204.
Hearings; service of notice generally; contents.

On such petition being filed the court or judge thereof shall make an order fixing the time and place of the hearing thereon and ordering notice; thereupon the clerk of said circuit court, for the county in which the proceedings are instituted, shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the filing of such petition to be given:

By serving or causing to be served a copy of such notice on each person owning, or entitled to possession by virtue of public land filing, of land within said proposed district, residing in any county in which any lands in said proposed district are situated, either personally or by leaving a copy thereof at his last usual place of abode, with a person of suitable age and discretion, and by registered mail to any mortgagee, mortgagees or judgment lienholder whose address is of record in the record of said lien in the county or counties in which said district is situated; and

By publishing a copy thereof at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in each county within which any of the lands of the district are situated. If there be no newspaper in any such county, such notice may be published in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

Such notice shall:

State in what court said petition is filed;

Give a general description of the proposed work;

Give the proposed boundaries of said district (or a general description of all the lands in said proposed district);

Give the name proposed for said irrigation district;

State the time and place by the court fixed, when and where the petitioners will ask a hearing on said petition; and

Direct all persons owning or having an interest in any lands within the boundary of the proposed district, to appear at the time and place stated, then and there to show cause why their land should not be included in said district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 953; Laws 1929, ch. 83, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-703; C.S. 1945, § 71-803; W.S. 1957, § 41-276; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Failure to give notice immediately after filing of petition is not jurisdictional,

as the court obtains jurisdiction by filing of the petition, and the notice does not confer nor destroy jurisdiction. Padlock Ranch v. Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 50 Wyo. 253, 60 P.2d 819,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1936).

Question in connection with boundaries. —

This section provides that the notice shall state, among others, “the proposed boundaries of said district (or a general description of all the lands in said proposed district).” It would seem that in view of this statute (§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

) no question can be subsequently raised in connection with the boundaries of the district. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-205.
Hearings; notification of nonresidents; personal service in lieu of posting for all persons.

If any of the persons owning or entitled to possession of land in said district are nonresidents of the county or counties in which the proposed district lies, the petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit giving the names and post office address of each such nonresident, if such are known, and if unknown shall state that, upon diligent inquiry their names or post office addresses (whichever may be the fact) cannot be ascertained. The clerk of the court shall mail a copy of the notice aforesaid to each of said nonresident owners whose post-office address is known, within six (6) days after the first publication of the same. The certificate of the clerk of the court, or other public officer, or the affidavit of any other person who knows the facts, affixed to a copy of said notice, shall be sufficient evidence of the posting, serving, mailing or publication thereof. Personal service of said notice on (or service by leaving at the last usual place of abode of) all persons owning or entitled to possession of lands or interest in lands within said district, shall give the court complete jurisdiction, without posting, publication or mailing of said notice.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 5 to 7; C.S. 1920, § 954; R.S. 1931, § 122-704; C.S. 1945, § 71-804; W.S. 1957, § 41-277.

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-206.
Hearings; adjournment to serve persons not served.

If it shall be found before the hearing on the petition for the organization of an irrigation district, that one (1) or more of the persons owning or entitled to possession of land in said district have not been duly served with notice of hearing on said petition, the court or presiding judge shall not thereby lose jurisdiction. The court or presiding judge in such case shall adjourn the hearing, make an order directing the serving of said notice upon said person or persons, and fixing the time and manner of service of such notice, which notice shall notify him to appear at said adjourned time and place and be heard on said petition. Said notice shall be served personally or by leaving at the last usual place of abode of said unserved persons, as in W.S.

41-7-204

provided, not less than eight (8) days before said adjourned hearing, or published not less than fourteen (14) days before said adjourned hearing, in some newspaper published in the county in which said persons’ lands lie, or if no newspaper may be published in said county, then in some newspaper published in an adjoining county. Upon the adjourned day the same proceedings, adjournments, trial, findings and orders may be had as in case of complete service of notice in the first instance. In case of failure to mail said notice as herein required, the court or judge may order the same mailed later and shall adjourn said hearing so that said notice shall be mailed at least fourteen (14) days before said adjourned hearing. In case of failure to publish or post notice, as in this act required, the court or judge may adjourn said hearing for sufficient time to permit the due posting and publication of said notice, and order said notice posted or published as in section 4 [§

41-7-204

] hereof directed. In case of adjournment to permit notice to be given, the notice shall state the fact of such adjournment and the time and place of hearing pursuant to said adjournment.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 8 to 10; C.S. 1920, § 955; R.S. 1931, § 122-705; C.S. 1945, § 71-805; W.S. 1957, § 41-278.

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-207.
Hearings; contests; grounds; notice of objections to be in writing; filing of objections.

On the day fixed for hearing on such petition, all persons owning or entitled to the possession of lands, or any interest or easement in land, within said proposed district, or who may be affected thereby, may appear and contest or object to:

The sufficiency of the petition;

The sufficiency of the signers of the petition;

The sufficiency of the notice;

The constitutionality of the law;

The inclusion or exclusion of any lands in the district, or any other material issue raised by the petition;

The jurisdiction of the court, specifying their objections to such jurisdiction; and the petitioners and contestants may, on the trial, offer any competent evidence in regard thereto.

All notices of contests or objection shall be in writing and shall clearly specify the grounds of contest or objection and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of court wherein such petition is filed at least five (5) days prior to the day set for the hearing. The court shall on the day fixed for said hearing, hear and determine all issues provided in this section and may adjourn said hearing from time to time, for good and sufficient reason shown.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 11, 12; C.S. 1920, § 956; R.S. 1931, § 122-706; Laws 1937, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-806; W.S. 1957, § 41-279.

§ 41-7-208.
Hearings; dismissal of petition improperly signed; inclusion or exclusion of land from district.

If the court or presiding judge thereof, after hearing any and all competent evidence that may be offered for and against the said petition, shall find that the same has not been signed as herein required, the said petition shall be dismissed at the cost of the petitioners, and judgment shall be entered against said petitioners for the amount of said costs. The court shall upon proper showing include or exclude any land from the district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 15; C.S. 1920, § 959; R.S. 1931, § 122-709; C.S. 1945, § 71-809; W.S. 1957, § 41-280.

§ 41-7-209.
Fraudulent deeds for establishment or defeat of petition.

All deeds made for the purpose of establishing or defeating the prayer of said petition, and not made in good faith and for a valuable consideration, shall be taken and held to be a fraud, and the holders thereof shall not be considered as the owners of the lands described therein; and the filing of said petition shall constitute a lis pendens against all lands described therein from and after the filing thereof.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 14; C.S. 1920, § 958; R.S. 1931, § 122-708; C.S. 1945, § 71-808; W.S. 1957, § 41-281.

§ 41-7-210.
Court's order.

If the issues at this hearing are decided in favor of the petitioners, the court shall make an order:

Approving and confirming the petition;

Defining the boundaries of the district;

Dividing the district into three (3) or five (5) subdivisions as the court may consider appropriate, which subdivisions shall be as nearly equal in size as may be practicable and which shall be designated as commissioner districts, and each district shall be numbered consecutively. Should the district be first divided into three (3) subdivisions the same shall be thereafter increased to five (5) subdivisions, and the number of commissioners increased to five (5), provided a majority of the qualified electors voting, vote in favor of such increase at an election called for the purpose. Said election for the increased number of districts and commissioners shall be called upon the order of the district commissioners upon receipt by them of a petition requesting such an election signed by at least thirty percent (30%) of the qualified electors of the district. If a majority of the qualified electors voting should vote in favor of such an increase the district commissioners shall forthwith proceed to redivide the district into five (5) subdivisions as nearly equal in size as may be practicable, and commissioners shall be elected to represent all districts, as redivided, at the next general election of the district, and the terms of such commissioners and the order of their retirement shall be as provided for in the case of first election of commissioners after the formation of the district;

Establishing said district as a corporation by the name proposed with powers:

To sue and be sued;

To adopt and use a corporate seal;

To have perpetual succession;

To file on and acquire the right to use of water for domestic and irrigation purposes; to acquire sites for reservoirs, and rights of way for ditches, canals and laterals;

To exercise the power of eminent domain under chapter 316 (C.S. 1920), and all acts or parts of acts amendatory thereto;

To contract with the state of Wyoming for the reclamation and segregation of public lands pursuant to the laws of the United States and the state of Wyoming and to contract for the sale of water rights by it acquired pursuant to said laws, and to purchase and acquire state lands;

To acquire by purchase or otherwise irrigation works, water rights, land and other property and to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of the same, to buy, develop, sell and distribute electrical energy as an incident to the ownership, control and operation of irrigation works of the district or the cooperative works of the district and the United States as the district may deem expedient or suitable for the development of the district.

Shall appoint one (1) commissioner from each commissioner district, who shall be a freeholder or entryman upon public lands, in said district, provided, however, if the majority of the irrigable area of the district is unentered public land, a majority of the commissioners shall be appointed by the secretary of the interior, who shall be residents of the state. The commissioners appointed by the court shall at all times be under the direction of the court and may be removed from office by the court upon good cause shown; provided, however, no commissioner shall be removed until written charges specifying the ground upon which such removal is sought are filed, and an opportunity given such commissioner to be heard at a hearing provided. In case a commissioner has been removed under this provision the court shall immediately appoint a successor. All findings and order of the court made at the hearing herein provided for shall be final and conclusive unless appealed from to the supreme court within thirty (30) days after filing thereof.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 16; C.S. 1920, § 960; Laws 1921, ch. 54, § 1; 1923, ch. 91, § 1; 1925, ch. 53, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-710; C.S. 1945, § 71-810; W.S. 1957, § 41-282.

Cross references. —

As to powers generally of district commissioners, see §

41-7-303

.

As to election, term, etc., of commissioners, see §§

41-7-316

through

41-7-318

.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 316 of C.S. 1920, referred to in subsection (a)(iv)(E), appeared as §§

1-26-401

, 1-26-403 and 1-26-404, before being repealed in 1981.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Unnecessary extension of time. —

Parties lose no rights on appealing from order under irrigation district law by applying for unnecessary extension of time for perfecting their appeal where appeal is thereafter perfected within time prescribed by direct appeal statute. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 48 Wyo. 523, 52 P.2d 410,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1935).

Irrigation district not exempt from automobile license fees. —

Irrigation district is not a legal subdivision of state within statute creating exemptions from automobile license fees, since district could conduct operations for profit. State ex rel. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Hunt, 49 Wyo. 497, 57 P.2d 793,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1936).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926); Lincoln Land Co. v. Goshen Irrigation Dist., 42 Wyo. 229, 293 P. 373,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1930).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).